Vermont, session 2025-2026, S111.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 1 V.S.A. § 340 is added to read:
§ 340. LANGUAGE ACCESS FOR CRITICAL SERVICES
(a) As used in this section:
VT LEG #381268 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.111
2025 Page 2 of 2
(1) “Critical services” means services that are provided in response to an
all-hazard event as defined by 20 V.S.A. § 2 or information provided by a State
agency that affects an individual’s legal rights, privileges, or duties.
(2) “Translated material” means any written or recorded information
that is translated for individuals who do not speak English.
(b) The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Health shall
establish and maintain contracts with organizations within the State to provide
translated material for any critical services provided by a State agency.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATIONS
In fiscal year 2026, the following sums are appropriated from the General
Fund for purposes of producing informational media and advertisements
concerning the availability of translated material for critical services:
(1) $125,000.00 to the Department of Public Safety; and
(2) $125,000.00 to the Department of Health.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381268 v.1